Illinois, session 104th, SB2945.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The OSF Children's Hospital of Illinois Fund. 8    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 9changing Section 3-699.14 as follows: 10    (625 ILCS 5/3-699.14)11    Sec. 3-699.14. Universal special license plates.12    (a) In addition to any other special license plate, the 13Secretary, upon receipt of all applicable fees and 14applications made in the form prescribed by the Secretary, may 15issue Universal special license plates to residents of 16Illinois on behalf of organizations that have been authorized 17by the General Assembly to issue decals for Universal special 18license plates. Appropriate documentation, as determined by 19the Secretary, shall accompany each application. Authorized 20organizations shall be designated by amendment to this 21Section. When applying for a Universal special license plate   SB2945 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1the applicant shall inform the Secretary of the name of the 2authorized organization from which the applicant will obtain a 3decal to place on the plate. The Secretary shall make a record 4of that organization and that organization shall remain 5affiliated with that plate until the plate is surrendered, 6revoked, or otherwise canceled. The authorized organization 7may charge a fee to offset the cost of producing and 8distributing the decal, but that fee shall be retained by the 9authorized organization and shall be separate and distinct 10from any registration fees charged by the Secretary. No decal, 11sticker, or other material may be affixed to a Universal 12special license plate other than a decal authorized by the 13General Assembly in this Section or a registration renewal 14sticker. The special plates issued under this Section shall be 15affixed only to passenger vehicles of the first division, 16including motorcycles and autocycles, or motor vehicles of the 17second division weighing not more than 8,000 pounds. Plates 18issued under this Section shall expire according to the 19multi-year procedure under Section 3-414.1 of this Code.20    (b) The design, color, and format of the Universal special 21license plate shall be wholly within the discretion of the 22Secretary. Universal special license plates are not required 23to designate "Land of Lincoln", as prescribed in subsection 24(b) of Section 3-412 of this Code. The design shall allow for 25the application of a decal to the plate. Organizations 26authorized by the General Assembly to issue decals for   SB2945 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1Universal special license plates shall comply with rules 2adopted by the Secretary governing the requirements for and 3approval of Universal special license plate decals. The 4Secretary may, in his or her discretion, allow Universal 5special license plates to be issued as vanity or personalized 6plates in accordance with Section 3-405.1 of this Code. The 7Secretary of State must make a version of the special 8registration plates authorized under this Section in a form 9appropriate for motorcycles and autocycles.10    (c) When authorizing a Universal special license plate, 11the General Assembly shall set forth whether an additional fee 12is to be charged for the plate and, if a fee is to be charged, 13the amount of the fee and how the fee is to be distributed. 14When necessary, the authorizing language shall create a 15special fund in the State treasury into which fees may be 16deposited for an authorized Universal special license plate. 17Additional fees may only be charged if the fee is to be paid 18over to a State agency or to a charitable entity that is in 19compliance with the registration and reporting requirements of 20the Charitable Trust Act and the Solicitation for Charity Act. 21Any charitable entity receiving fees for the sale of Universal 22special license plates shall annually provide the Secretary of 23State a letter of compliance issued by the Attorney General 24verifying that the entity is in compliance with the Charitable 25Trust Act and the Solicitation for Charity Act.26    (d) Upon original issuance and for each registration   SB2945 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1renewal period, in addition to the appropriate registration 2fee, if applicable, the Secretary shall collect any additional 3fees, if required, for issuance of Universal special license 4plates. The fees shall be collected on behalf of the 5organization designated by the applicant when applying for the 6plate. All fees collected shall be transferred to the State 7agency on whose behalf the fees were collected, or paid into 8the special fund designated in the law authorizing the 9organization to issue decals for Universal special license 10plates. All money in the designated fund shall be distributed 11by the Secretary subject to appropriation by the General 12Assembly.13    (e) The following organizations may issue decals for 14Universal special license plates with the original and renewal 15fees and fee distribution as follows: 16        (1) The Illinois Department of Natural Resources. 17            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the 18        Roadside Monarch Habitat Fund and $15 to the Secretary 19        of State Special License Plate Fund. 20            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Roadside Monarch 21        Habitat Fund and $2 to the Secretary of State Special 22        License Plate Fund. 23        (2) Illinois Veterans' Homes.24            (A) Original issuance: $26, which shall be 25        deposited into the Illinois Veterans' Homes Fund.26            (B) Renewal: $26, which shall be deposited into   SB2945 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1        the Illinois Veterans' Homes Fund.2        (3) The Illinois Department of Human Services for 3    volunteerism decals.4            (A) Original issuance: $25, which shall be 5        deposited into the Secretary of State Special License 6        Plate Fund.7            (B) Renewal: $25, which shall be deposited into 8        the Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund. 9        (4) The Illinois Department of Public Health.10            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the 11        Prostate Cancer Awareness Fund and $15 to the 12        Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.13            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Prostate Cancer 14        Awareness Fund and $2 to the Secretary of State 15        Special License Plate Fund. 16        (5) Horsemen's Council of Illinois.17            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the 18        Horsemen's Council of Illinois Fund and $15 to the 19        Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.20            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Horsemen's 21        Council of Illinois Fund and $2 to the Secretary of 22        State Special License Plate Fund.23        (6) K9s for Veterans, NFP.24            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the 25        Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder Awareness Fund and $15 26        to the Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.  SB2945 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Post-Traumatic 2        Stress Disorder Awareness Fund and $2 to the Secretary 3        of State Special License Plate Fund. 4        (7) The International Association of Machinists and 5    Aerospace Workers. 6            (A) Original issuance: $35; with $20 to the Guide 7        Dogs of America Fund and $15 to the Secretary of State 8        Special License Plate Fund.9            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 going to the Guide Dogs 10        of America Fund and $2 to the Secretary of State 11        Special License Plate Fund.12        (8) Local Lodge 701 of the International Association 13    of Machinists and Aerospace Workers. 14            (A) Original issuance: $35; with $10 to the Guide 15        Dogs of America Fund, $10 to the Mechanics Training 16        Fund, and $15 to the Secretary of State Special 17        License Plate Fund.18            (B) Renewal: $30; with $13 to the Guide Dogs of 19        America Fund, $15 to the Mechanics Training Fund, and 20        $2 to the Secretary of State Special License Plate 21        Fund.22        (9) Illinois Department of Human Services.23            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the 24        Theresa Tracy Trot - Illinois CancerCare Foundation 25        Fund and $15 to the Secretary of State Special License 26        Plate Fund.  SB2945 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Theresa Tracy 2        Trot - Illinois CancerCare Foundation Fund and $2 to 3        the Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.4        (10) The Illinois Department of Human Services for 5    developmental disabilities awareness decals.6            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the 7        Developmental Disabilities Awareness Fund and $15 to 8        the Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.9            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Developmental 10        Disabilities Awareness Fund and $2 to the Secretary of 11        State Special License Plate Fund.12        (11) The Illinois Department of Human Services for 13    pediatric cancer awareness decals.14            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the 15        Pediatric Cancer Awareness Fund and $15 to the 16        Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.17            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Pediatric Cancer 18        Awareness Fund and $2 to the Secretary of State 19        Special License Plate Fund.20        (12) The Department of Veterans Affairs for Fold of 21    Honor decals. 22            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the Folds 23        of Honor Foundation Fund and $15 to the Secretary of 24        State Special License Plate Fund. 25            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Folds of Honor 26        Foundation Fund and $2 to the Secretary of State   SB2945 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1        Special License Plate Fund.2        (13) The Illinois chapters of the Experimental 3    Aircraft Association for aviation enthusiast decals.4            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the 5        Experimental Aircraft Association Fund and $15 to the 6        Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.7            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Experimental 8        Aircraft Association Fund and $2 to the Secretary of 9        State Special License Plate Fund. 10        (14) The Illinois Department of Human Services for 11    Child Abuse Council of the Quad Cities decals. 12            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the Child 13        Abuse Council of the Quad Cities Fund and $15 to the 14        Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund. 15            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Child Abuse 16        Council of the Quad Cities Fund and $2 to the Secretary 17        of State Special License Plate Fund.18        (15) The Illinois Department of Public Health for 19    health care worker decals.20            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the 21        Illinois Health Care Workers Benefit Fund, and $15 to 22        the Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.23            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Illinois Health 24        Care Workers Benefit Fund and $2 to the Secretary of 25        State Special License Plate Fund. 26        (16) The Department of Agriculture for Future Farmers   SB2945 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1    of America decals.2            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the Future 3        Farmers of America Fund and $15 to the Secretary of 4        State Special License Plate Fund.5            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Future Farmers 6        of America Fund and $2 to the Secretary of State 7        Special License Plate Fund. 8        (17) The Illinois Department of Public Health for 9    autism awareness decals that are designed with input from 10    autism advocacy organizations.11            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the Autism 12        Awareness Fund and $15 to the Secretary of State 13        Special License Plate Fund.14            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Autism Awareness 15        Fund and $2 to the Secretary of State Special License 16        Plate Fund. 17        (18) The Department of Natural Resources for Lyme 18    disease research decals. 19            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the Tick 20        Research, Education, and Evaluation Fund and $15 to 21        the Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.22            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Tick Research, 23        Education, and Evaluation Fund and $2 to the Secretary 24        of State Special License Plate Fund.25        (19) The IBEW Thank a Line Worker decal. 26            (A) Original issuance: $15, which shall be   SB2945 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1        deposited into the Secretary of State Special License 2        Plate Fund.3            (B) Renewal: $2, which shall be deposited into the 4        Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund. 5        (20) An Illinois chapter of the Navy Club for Navy 6    Club decals. 7            (A) Original issuance: $5; which shall be 8    deposited into the Navy Club Fund. 9            (B) Renewal: $18; which shall be deposited into 10    the Navy Club Fund. 11        (21) An Illinois chapter of the International 12    Brotherhood of Electrical Workers for International 13    Brotherhood of Electrical Workers decal. 14            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the 15        International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers Fund 16        and $15 to the Secretary of State Special License 17        Plate Fund. 18            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the International 19        Brotherhood of Electrical Workers Fund and $2 to the 20        Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund. 21        (22) The 100 Club of Illinois decal. 22            (A) Original issuance: $45; with $30 to the 100 23        Club of Illinois Fund and $15 to the Secretary of State 24        Special License Plate Fund.25            (B) Renewal: $27; with $25 to the 100 Club of 26        Illinois Fund and $2 to the Secretary of State Special   SB2945 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1        License Plate Fund. 2        (23) The Illinois USTA/Midwest Youth Tennis Foundation 3    decal. 4            (A) Original issuance: $40; with $25 to the 5        Illinois USTA/Midwest Youth Tennis Foundation Fund and 6        $15 to the Secretary of State Special License Plate 7        Fund.8            (B) Renewal: $40; with $38 to the Illinois 9        USTA/Midwest Youth Tennis Foundation Fund and $2 to 10        the Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund. 11        (24) The Sons of the American Legion decal.12            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the Sons 13        of the American Legion Fund and $15 to the Secretary of 14        State Special License Plate Fund.15            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the Sons of the 16        American Legion Fund and $2 to the Secretary of State 17        Special License Plate Fund. 18        (25) The OSF Children's Hospital of Illinois decal.19            (A) Original issuance: $25; with $10 to the OSF 20        Children's Hospital of Illinois Fund and $15 to the 21        Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.22            (B) Renewal: $25; with $23 to the OSF Children's 23        Hospital of Illinois Fund and $2 to the Secretary of 24        State Special License Plate Fund. 25    (f) The following funds are created as special funds in 26the State treasury:   SB2945 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1        (1) The Roadside Monarch Habitat Fund. All money in 2    the Roadside Monarch Habitat Fund shall be paid as grants 3    by the Illinois Department of Natural Resources to fund 4    roadside monarch and other pollinator habitat development, 5    enhancement, and restoration projects in this State. 6        (2) The Prostate Cancer Awareness Fund. All money in 7    the Prostate Cancer Awareness Fund shall be paid as grants 8    to the Prostate Cancer Foundation of Chicago. 9        (3) The Horsemen's Council of Illinois Fund. All money 10    in the Horsemen's Council of Illinois Fund shall be paid 11    as grants to the Horsemen's Council of Illinois. 12        (4) The Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder Awareness Fund. 13    All money in the Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder Awareness 14    Fund shall be paid as grants to K9s for Veterans, NFP for 15    support, education, and awareness of veterans with 16    post-traumatic stress disorder.17        (5) The Guide Dogs of America Fund. All money in the 18    Guide Dogs of America Fund shall be paid as grants to the 19    International Guiding Eyes, Inc., doing business as Guide 20    Dogs of America.21        (6) The Mechanics Training Fund. All money in the 22    Mechanics Training Fund shall be paid as grants to the 23    Mechanics Local 701 Training Fund.24        (7) The Theresa Tracy Trot - Illinois CancerCare 25    Foundation Fund. All money in the Theresa Tracy Trot - 26    Illinois CancerCare Foundation Fund shall be paid to the   SB2945 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1    Illinois CancerCare Foundation for the purpose of 2    furthering pancreatic cancer research.3        (8) The Developmental Disabilities Awareness Fund. All 4    money in the Developmental Disabilities Awareness Fund 5    shall be paid as grants to the Illinois Department of 6    Human Services to fund legal aid groups to assist with 7    guardianship fees for private citizens willing to become 8    guardians for individuals with developmental disabilities 9    but who are unable to pay the legal fees associated with 10    becoming a guardian.11        (9) The Pediatric Cancer Awareness Fund. All money in 12    the Pediatric Cancer Awareness Fund shall be paid as 13    grants to the Cancer Center at Illinois for pediatric 14    cancer treatment and research.15        (10) The Folds of Honor Foundation Fund. All money in 16    the Folds of Honor Foundation Fund shall be paid as grants 17    to the Folds of Honor Foundation to aid in providing 18    educational scholarships to military families. 19        (11) The Experimental Aircraft Association Fund. All 20    money in the Experimental Aircraft Association Fund shall 21    be paid, subject to appropriation by the General Assembly 22    and distribution by the Secretary, as grants to promote 23    recreational aviation. 24        (12) The Child Abuse Council of the Quad Cities Fund. 25    All money in the Child Abuse Council of the Quad Cities 26    Fund shall be paid as grants to benefit the Child Abuse   SB2945 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1    Council of the Quad Cities. 2        (13) The Illinois Health Care Workers Benefit Fund. 3    All money in the Illinois Health Care Workers Benefit Fund 4    shall be paid as grants to the Trinity Health Foundation 5    for the benefit of health care workers, doctors, nurses, 6    and others who work in the health care industry in this 7    State. 8        (14) The Future Farmers of America Fund. All money in 9    the Future Farmers of America Fund shall be paid as grants 10    to the Illinois Association of Future Farmers of America. 11        (15) The Tick Research, Education, and Evaluation 12    Fund. All money in the Tick Research, Education, and 13    Evaluation Fund shall be paid as grants to the Illinois 14    Lyme Association.15        (16) The Navy Club Fund. All money in the Navy Club 16    Fund shall be paid as grants to any local chapter of the 17    Navy Club that is located in this State. 18        (17) The International Brotherhood of Electrical 19    Workers Fund. All money in the International Brotherhood 20    of Electrical Workers Fund shall be paid as grants to any 21    local chapter of the International Brotherhood of 22    Electrical Workers that is located in this State. 23        (18) The 100 Club of Illinois Fund. All money in the 24    100 Club of Illinois Fund shall be paid as grants to the 25    100 Club of Illinois for the purpose of giving financial 26    support to children and spouses of first responders killed   SB2945 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17424 LNS 30849 b1    in the line of duty and mental health resources for active 2    duty first responders. 3        (19) The Illinois USTA/Midwest Youth Tennis Foundation 4    Fund. All money in the Illinois USTA/Midwest Youth Tennis 5    Foundation Fund shall be paid as grants to Illinois 6    USTA/Midwest Youth Tennis Foundation to aid USTA/Midwest 7    districts in the State with exposing youth to the game of 8    tennis.9        (20) The Sons of the American Legion Fund. All money 10    in the Sons of the American Legion Fund shall be paid as 11    grants to the Illinois Detachment of the Sons of the 12    American Legion.13        (21) The OSF Children's Hospital of Illinois Fund. All 14    money in the OSF Children's Hospital of Illinois Fund 15    shall be paid as grants to benefit the OSF Children's 16    Hospital of Illinois. 17(Source: P.A. 103-112, eff. 1-1-24; 103-163, eff. 1-1-24; 18103-349, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-664, eff. 191-1-25; 103-665, eff. 1-1-25; 103-855, eff. 1-1-25; 103-911, 20eff. 1-1-25; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25; 21104-234, eff. 8-15-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 229-12-25.)